Missouri, session 2026, HB2602.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 579.040 and 579.076, RSMo, are repealed and three new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 191.1011, 579.040, and 579.076, to read as
follows:
191.1011. 1. The department of health and senior services shall establish a
registration process for entities desiring to operate a syringe access program intended to
mitigate the health risks associated with unsterile injection drug use whereby any entity
that would like to operate such a program shall be allowed to do so if it meets
requirements set by the department of health and senior services.
2. The department of health and senior services shall require, as a condition for
registration under subsection 1 of this section, that the entity seeking registration has a
collaborative agreement with an organization that provides access to mental health and
substance use treatment options.
3. No entity registered with the department of health and senior services under
subsection 1 of this section shall be present within five hundred feet of any school
building unless the school building was constructed or established as a school after the
entity was in operation at such location.
4. The department of health and senior services shall promulgate rules to
implement the provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2602 2
shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of
chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to
chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule
proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
579.040. 1. (1) A person commits the offense of unlawful distribution, delivery, or
sale of drug paraphernalia if he or she unlawfully distributes, delivers, or sells, or possesses
with intent to distribute, deliver, or sell drug paraphernalia knowing, or under circumstances
in which one reasonably should know, that it will be used to plant, propogate, cultivate, grow,
harvest, manufacture, compound, convert, produce, process, prepare, test, analyze, pack,
repack, store, contain, conceal, inject, ingest, inhale, or otherwise introduce into the human
body a controlled substance or an imitation controlled substance in violation of this chapter.
(2) The following entities and persons shall be exempt from the provisions of this
section:
(a) Any entity registered with the department of health and senior services
under section 191.1011 that possesses, distributes, or delivers hypodermic needles or
syringes for the purpose of operating a syringe access program described under section
191.1011; and
(b) Any staff member, volunteer, or participant in a syringe access program
operated by an entity described under paragraph (a) of this subdivision who possesses,
distributes, or delivers hypodermic needles or syringes in connection with his or her
duties or participation in the syringe access program.
2. The offense of unlawful delivery of drug paraphernalia is a class A misdemeanor,
unless done for commercial purposes, in which case it is a class E felony.
579.076. 1. (1) A person commits the offense of unlawful manufacture of drug
paraphernalia if he or she unlawfully manufactures with intent to deliver drug paraphernalia,
knowing, or under circumstances where one reasonably should know, that it will be used to
plant, propagate, cultivate, grow, harvest, manufacture, compound, convert, produce, process,
prepare, test, analyze, pack, repack, store, contain, conceal, inject, ingest, inhale, or otherwise
introduce into the human body a controlled substance or an imitation controlled substance in
violation of this chapter or chapter 195.
(2) The following entities and persons shall be exempt from the provisions of this
section:
(a) Any entity registered with the department of health and senior services
under section 191.1011 that delivers or manufactures hypodermic needles or syringes

HB 2602 3
for the purpose of operating a syringe access program described under section 191.1011;
and
(b) Any staff member, volunteer, or participant in a syringe access program
operated by an entity described under paragraph (a) of this subdivision who delivers or
manufactures hypodermic needles or syringes in connection with his or her duties or
participation in the syringe access program.
2. The offense of unlawful manufacture of drug paraphernalia is a class A
misdemeanor, unless done for commercial purposes, in which case it is a class E felony.
✔